Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 26

Prevention of Fraud and Abuse in TennCare

71-5-2601. Offenses — Penalties — Remedies — Limitations.

A person, including an enrollee, recipient, or applicant, commits an offense who knowingly obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person to obtain, by means of a willfully false statement, representation, or impersonation, or by concealment of any material fact, or by any other fraudulent means, or in any manner not authorized by any rule, regulation, or statute governing TennCare:

Medical assistance benefits or any assistance provided pursuant to any rule, regulation, procedure, or statute governing TennCare to which such person is not entitled, or of a greater value than that to which such person is authorized;

Benefits by knowingly making a willfully false statement, or concealing a material fact relating to personal or household income, thereby resulting in the assessment of a lower monthly premium than the person would be required to pay if not for the false statement or concealment of a material fact; or

Controlled substance benefits by knowingly, willfully and with the intent to deceive, failing to disclose to a physician, nurse practitioner, ancillary staff, or other health care provider from whom the person obtains a controlled substance, or a prescription for a controlled substance, that the person has received either the same controlled substance or a prescription for the same controlled substance, or a controlled substance of similar therapeutic use or a prescription for a controlled substance of similar therapeutic use, from another practitioner within the previous thirty (30) days and the person used TennCare to obtain the benefits.

An offense under subdivision (a)(1)(A) is a Class D felony. In addition to restitution, a person who pleads guilty or nolo contendere or is found guilty of violating this section shall be fined:

Two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for the first offense;

Five hundred dollars ($500) for the second offense; and

One thousand dollars ($1,000) for a third or subsequent offense.

The fines authorized under subdivision (a)(1)(B) shall be collected by the county court clerk with five percent (5%) of the fine going to the clerk of the court and the remaining ninety-five percent (95%) of the fine transmitted to the state treasurer on a monthly basis for deposit in the general fund.

A person, firm, corporation, partnership or any other entity, including a vendor, other than an enrollee, recipient, or applicant, commits an offense who knowingly obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person or entity to obtain, by means of a willfully false statement, report, representation, claim or impersonation, or by concealment of any material fact, or by any other fraudulent means, including knowingly presenting or causing to be presented to TennCare or any of its contractors, subcontractors or vendors a false or fraudulent claim for payment or approval, or in any manner not authorized by any rule, regulation, procedure, or statute governing TennCare, medical assistance payments provided pursuant to any rule, regulation, procedure, or statute governing TennCare to which the person or entity is not entitled, or of a greater value than that to which the person or entity is authorized. For purposes of this subsection (a), “attempts to obtain” includes making or presenting to any person a claim for any payment under any rule, regulation, procedure, or statute governing TennCare, knowing the claim to be false, fictitious or fraudulent.

An offense under subdivision (a)(2)(A) is a Class D felony unless the value of the property or services obtained meets the threshold set for a Class B or Class C offense under § 39-14-105, in which case the appropriate higher class shall apply. In addition to any other penalty, a sentence that includes a fine, when imposed upon an entity or upon a person for actions benefiting an entity, shall include the corporation fine specified in § 40-35-111.

A person, firm, corporation, partnership or any other entity commits an offense when providing a willfully false statement regarding another's medical condition or eligibility for insurance, to aid or abet another in obtaining or attempting to obtain medical assistance payments, medical assistance benefits or any assistance provided under any rule, regulation, procedure, or statute governing TennCare to which the person is not entitled or to a greater value than that to which such person is authorized. For purposes of this subsection (a), “attempting to obtain” includes making or presenting to any person a claim for any payment under any rule, regulation, procedure, or statute governing TennCare, knowing such claim to be false, fictitious or fraudulent.

An offense under subdivision (a)(3)(A) is a Class D felony unless the value of the property or services obtained meets the threshold set for a Class B or Class C offense under § 39-14-105, in which case the appropriate higher class shall apply. In addition to any other penalty, a sentence that includes a fine, when imposed upon an entity or upon a person for actions benefiting an entity, shall include the corporation fine specified in § 40-35-111.

Any person, firm, corporation, partnership or other entity is guilty of a Class D felony that, in connection with the investigation of a violation of offenses set forth in this section, knowingly and willfully:

Falsifies, conceals or omits by any trick, scheme, artifice, or device a material fact;

Makes any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement or representation; or

Makes or uses any materially false writing or document.

A person commits an offense who knowingly sells, delivers, or aids and abets any person in the sale or delivery of a drug and used TennCare to obtain the drug.

As used in this subdivision (a)(5), “drug”, “deliver” and “delivery” shall have the same meaning as set forth in § 39-17-402.

This subdivision (a)(5) shall not apply to any duly licensed physician, nurse practitioner, pharmacist, or other provider authorized to issue or dispense a prescription acting in good faith in the course of that person's profession.

An offense under this subdivision (a)(5) is a Class D felony.

In addition to any other penalties provided for any person, firm, corporation, partnership or other entity under subsection (a), the court shall also:

Order restitution to TennCare in the greater of the total amount of all medical assistance payments made to all providers, or the total amount of all payments to a managed care entity, related to the services underlying the offense; and

Report the person or entity to the appropriate professional licensure board or the department of commerce and insurance for disciplinary action.

In addition to any other penalties provided under this section, the court may also, to the full extent permitted by federal law and the TennCare waiver as interpreted by the CMS, order any such person or entity disqualified from participation in the medical assistance program; such disqualification may also apply to any person who is convicted of a criminal offense involving the selling of prescription drugs obtained through the TennCare program. Any person or entity disqualified from participation in the medical assistance program shall make restitution in the total amount of the medical assistance or underpayment which forms the basis for the conviction before such person or entity can reenroll in the TennCare program.

A subsequent denial of eligibility or denial of a claim for payment does not, of itself, establish proof of falsity of a statement, representation, report or claim for payment under subsection (a).

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting a person or entity violating this section from being prosecuted for theft of property or services under title 39, chapter 14.

In addition to any other remedy available, including those provided in this section, the state may recover from any person or such person's estate, or from a firm, corporation, partnership or other entity, including a vendor, the amount of medical assistance benefits or payments improperly paid as a result of fraudulent means or actions not authorized by any rule, regulation, procedure, or statute governing TennCare.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, prosecutions for violations of this section shall be commenced within four (4) years after the commission of the offense.

Acts 2004, ch. 784, § 1; 2007, ch. 103, § 1; 2007, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 1139, § 1; 2013, ch. 159, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 744, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 784, § 3 provided that the commissioner of the department of finance and administration, or the commissioner's designee, shall appear before and report in writing on fraud and abuse in the TennCare program to the TennCare oversight committee, the senate general welfare, health and human resources committee and the house health and human resources committee on at least an annual basis. Such report shall include commentary concerning implementation, rules and regulations concerning senate bill 3394 / house bill 3512 (this act) and senate bill 3392 / house bill 3513 (chapter 673) if such bills become law. This act became effective May 28, 2004, and Acts 2004, ch. 673 became effective May 17, 2004.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class B, Class C, Class D, Class E, and Class F felonies, §40-35-111.

Illegal solicitation of elderly for medical equipment, §39-15-513.

71-5-2602. Record keeping.

Upon submitting a claim for, or upon receiving payment for, goods, services, items, facilities or accommodations under the TennCare program, a managed care organization, provider, vendor, subcontractor, or any other person or entity, shall maintain adequate records for a minimum of five (5) years after the date on which payment was received, if payment was received, or for five (5) years after the date on which the claim was submitted, if payment was not received. The bureau of TennCare shall have the authority to make appropriate and reasonable exceptions to the requirements of this subsection (a) upon a showing of good cause.

Failure to maintain adequate records is defined as negligently failing to maintain such records as are necessary to disclose fully the nature of the goods, services, items, facilities, or accommodations for which a claim was submitted or payment was received by the managed care organization, provider, vendor, subcontractor, or any other person or entity receiving funds originating from the TennCare program. Records include records kept in any form or fashion, including, but not limited to, any and all medical records, documents, data, or items, electronic or nonelectronic, related to the provision of and billing for services and goods. Failure to maintain adequate records during an audit period is punishable by recovery of one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the amount payable to the person or entity, directly or indirectly, using TennCare funds for the TennCare-related services for which the person or entity has failed to maintain records. Failure to maintain adequate records during a subsequent audit period is punishable by recovery of three hundred percent (300%) of the amount payable to the person or entity, directly or indirectly, using TennCare funds for the TennCare-related services for which the person or entity has failed to maintain records. Any further offense within five (5) years of the second offense may result in a recommendation by the office of inspector general to the bureau of TennCare to restrict the person or entity from receiving future TennCare payments. These matters shall be referred to the attorney general and reporter for recovery of funds.

Acts 2004, ch. 784, § 1; 2005, ch. 474, §§ 21, 22.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 784, § 3 provided that the commissioner of the department of finance and administration, or the commissioner's designee, shall appear before and report in writing on fraud and abuse in the TennCare program to the TennCare oversight committee, the senate general welfare, health and human resources committee and the house health and human resources committee on at least an annual basis. Such report shall include commentary concerning implementation, rules and regulations concerning senate bill 3394 / house bill 3512 (this act) and senate bill 3392 / house bill 3513 (chapter 673) if such bills become law. This act became effective May 28, 2004, and Acts 2004, ch. 673 became effective May 17, 2004.

71-5-2603. Fraud reporting requirements — Immunity from liability.

All managed care organizations, contractors, subcontractors, providers or any other person or entity shall advise the office of TennCare inspector general immediately when there is actual knowledge, not subject to a testimonial privilege, that an act of recipient, enrollee, or applicant fraud is being, or has been committed. The office of TennCare inspector general shall review the information to determine if there is a sufficient basis to warrant a full investigation. The office of TennCare inspector general is authorized to establish an electronic system for treating physicians to report recipient, enrollee or applicant fraud.

All managed care organizations, contractors, subcontractors, providers or any other person or entity shall advise the medicaid fraud control unit (MFCU) immediately when there is actual knowledge, not subject to a testimonial privilege, that an act of provider fraud is being, or has been committed. The MFCU shall review the information to determine if there is a sufficient basis to warrant a full investigation. MFCU is authorized to establish an electronic system for treating physicians to report provider fraud.

Any person or entity making a complaint or furnishing a report, information or records in good faith pursuant to this section is immune from civil liability for making such complaint or report.

Willful failure to report such fraud shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each finding to be assessed by the office of TennCare inspector general.

Acts 2004, ch. 784, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 784, § 3 provided that the commissioner of the department of finance and administration, or the commissioner's designee, shall appear before and report in writing on fraud and abuse in the TennCare program to the TennCare oversight committee, the senate general welfare, health and human resources committee and the house health and human resources committee on at least an annual basis. Such report shall include commentary concerning implementation, rules and regulations concerning senate bill 3394 / house bill 3512 (this act) and senate bill 3392 / house bill 3513 (chapter 673) if such bills become law. This act became effective May 28, 2004, and Acts 2004, ch. 673 became effective May 17, 2004.

71-5-2604. Administrative remedies — Recovery of costs — Contested cases — Rules and regulations — Final orders.

Without regard to any other civil or criminal liability that might attach, by operation of this section or any other law, the office of inspector general shall have an administrative remedy against an enrollee, recipient, applicant, or person purporting to be an enrollee, recipient, or applicant, who improperly obtains medical assistance benefits or any assistance from the TennCare program, to which the person is not entitled. The office of inspector general shall also have an administrative remedy against any person who assists any enrollee, recipient, or applicant, or purported enrollee, recipient, or applicant in improperly obtaining benefits or assistance.

The administrative remedy established by this section shall be for the recovery of the amount of:

Any medical assistance benefits or any assistance improperly paid for by TennCare as a result of any misrepresentation or omission made by the person, to the extent that the amount has not otherwise been recovered by the TennCare bureau; and

Any unpaid or underpaid premiums that were assessed at a lower monthly amount than would have been set if not for the misrepresentation or omission by the person, to the extent that the amount has not otherwise been recovered by the TennCare bureau.

All such persons shall be jointly and severally liable to the state of Tennessee.

The office of inspector general shall also have a right to recover the reasonable costs of proceedings pursuant to this section, including professional fees of court reporters and hearing officers or administrative judges, the reasonable costs of investigating claims arising under this section, reasonable attorney's fees, as well as interest on the amount owed by the person, calculated from the date that the medical assistance or any assistance was improperly received, or from the date the correct premiums should have been paid.

All costs of medical assistance, or any assistance, or unpaid premiums recouped pursuant to this section, and any interest thereon, shall be paid to the TennCare bureau. All costs of proceedings, investigative costs, and attorney's fees pursuant to this section shall be paid to the office of inspector general, except as otherwise provided.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, administrative actions pursuant to this section shall be commenced within four (4) years after the date of discovery by the state of the acts of misrepresentation or omission.

The office of inspector general may invoke the remedy established by this section by initiating a contested case in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. In an administrative action under this subsection (f), the office of the inspector general shall show that the amount sought to be recovered was paid in the form of medical assistance benefits or any assistance as a result of material misrepresentation or omission. The office of inspector general need not show that the misrepresentation or omission was intentional or fraudulent.

The inspector general shall have authority to promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, as are necessary to implement this part. The rules shall be promulgated as emergency rules. For purposes of rendering a final order pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, the inspector general is designated the agency person to review initial orders and issue final agency decisions. Orders issued by the inspector general shall have the effect of a final order pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Whenever an order issued by the inspector general pursuant to this part has become final, a notarized copy of the order may be filed in the office of the clerk of the chancery court of Davidson County.

When filed in accordance with this section, a final order shall be considered as a judgment by consent of the parties on the same terms and condition as those recited in the final order. The judgment shall be promptly entered by the court. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the procedure for entry of judgment and the effect of the judgment shall be the same as provided in title 26, chapter 6.

A judgment entered pursuant to this section shall become final on the date of entry.

A final judgment under this subsection (h) has the same effect, is subject to the same procedures, and may be enforced or satisfied in the same manner, as any other judgment of a court of record of this state.

Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 2; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 1010, § 3 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.